Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7211
Contracts; duties.

Whenever a health carrier contracts to have another entity perform the quality assessment or quality improvement functions required by the Quality Assessment and Improvement Act or applicable rules and regulations, the director shall hold the health carrier responsible for monitoring the activities of the entity with which it contracts and for ensuring that the requirements of the act and applicable rules and regulations are met.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 61.